Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2308
Afterborn heirs.

Relatives of the decedent conceived before his death but born thereafter inherit as if they had been born in the lifetime of the decedent.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 30, UPC § 2-108.

A child, conceived after the biological father’s death through intrauterine insemination using his sperm and born within 9 months of his death, cannot inherit from the father as the father’s surviving issue because the child was not conceived prior to the father’s death. Amen v. Astrue, 284 Neb. 691, 822 N.W.2d 419 (2012).